src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Cebuano language describe a nuerical quantity.

!cardinal
LEXICON Numerals
numeral+Num:numeral    Cases   ;
usa+Num:usa # "one" ;
duha+Num:duha # "two" ;
tulo+Num:tulo # "three" ;
!upat "four"
!lima "five"
!unom "six"
!pito "seven"
!walo "eight"
!siyam "nine"
napulo+v1+Num:napulo # "ten" ;! (can also be "pulo")
napulo+v2+Num:pulo # "ten" ;
!napulo ug usa "eleven" (basically, "napulo ug [1-9]", take note it can be also be "napulog [1-9]")
napulo% ug% usa+Num:napulo% ug% usa # "eleven" ; !This can expanded elsewhere, i.e., transcriptors
!kaluhaan "twenty" (can also be "kawhaan")
!katloan "thirty" (can also be "katuloan")
!kap-atan "forty" (can also be "kaupatan")
!kalim-an "fifty" (can also be "kalimaan")
!kan-oman "sixty" (can also be "kaunoman")
!kapitoan "seventy"
!kawaloan "eighty"
!kasiyaman "ninety"
!usa ka gatos "one hundred" (basically, "[0-9] ka gatos", "gatos" is the hundred)
!usa ka libo "one thousand" (basically, "[0-9] la libo", "libo" is the thousand)
!napulo ka libo "ten thousand"
!usa ka milyon "one millon" (basically, "[0-9] ka milyon)
!usa ka bilyon "one billion" (basically, [0-9] ka bilyon)


!ordinal
kina-unhan+A+Ord:kina-unhan # "first" ;
!ikaduha "second" (basically, ika- prefix attached to numbers)
!ikanapulo "tenth"
!ikakaluhaan "twenty"

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
